Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5621.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-54 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-54. Health insurance rates.
No insurance company organized as a stock or mutual corporation which merges or
consolidates with, acquires ownership or control or possession of twenty percent (20%) or greater
of the operating assets of, or otherwise acquires control of a non-profit hospital service corporation
organized under chapter 19 of this title, a non-profit medical service corporation organized under
chapter 20 of this title or a health maintenance organization organized under chapter 41 of this title
may: (1) file with any state agency for review or approval any proposed rate to be used by the
company in the state, or (2) charge to any party in the state any rate or premium, which takes into
account or reflects in any manner the value of any contribution, distribution or allocation the
company expends or incurs in establishing or funding a charitable foundation organized to maintain
or account for the assets of a non-profit hospital service corporation, non-profit medical service
corporation or health maintenance organization, or (3) pay a rate that is less than the approved
Medicaid rate set by the executive office of health and human services. For any rate that is to be
charged to policy holders, regardless of whether the rate is subject to approval by a state agency
under this or another chapter, the company shall at least thirty (30) days before implementing the
rate submit under oath to the commissioner of insurance an accounting that documents the cost
structure on which the rate is based and demonstrates the company’s compliance with this section.

SECTION 2. Section 27-19-30.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-30.1. Health insurance rates.
No insurance company organized as a stock or mutual corporation that merges or
consolidates with, acquires ownership or control or possession of twenty percent (20%) or greater
of the operating assets of, or otherwise acquires control of a nonprofit hospital service corporation
organized under this chapter, a nonprofit medical service corporation organized under chapter 20
of this title, or a health maintenance organization organized under chapter 41 of this title, may: (1)
File with any state agency for review or approval any proposed rate to be used by the company in
the state, or (2) Charge to any party in the state any rate or premium that takes into account or
reflects in any manner the value of any contribution, distribution, or allocation the company
expends or incurs in establishing or funding a charitable foundation organized to maintain or
otherwise account for the assets of a nonprofit hospital service corporation, nonprofit medical
service corporation, or health maintenance organization, or (3) pay a rate that is less than the
approved Medicaid rate set by the executive office of health and human services. For any rate that
is to be charged to policyholders, regardless of whether the rate is subject to approval by a state
agency under this or another chapter, the company shall at least thirty (30) days before
implementing the rate submit under oath to the commissioner of insurance an accounting that
documents the cost structure on which the rate is based and demonstrates the company’s
compliance with this section.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-25.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-25.2. Health insurance rates.
No insurance company organized as a stock or mutual corporation that merges or
consolidates with; acquires ownership or control or possession of twenty percent (20%) or greater
of the operating assets of; or acquires control of a nonprofit hospital service corporation organized
under chapter 19 of this title, a nonprofit medical service corporation organized under this chapter,
or a health maintenance organization organized under chapter 41 of this title may: (1) File with any
state agency for review or approval any proposed rate to be used by the company in the state, or
(2) Charge to any party in the state any rate or premium, that takes into account or reflects in any
manner the value of any contribution, distribution, or allocation the company expends or incurs in
establishing or funding a charitable foundation organized to maintain or account for the assets of a
nonprofit hospital service corporation, nonprofit medical service corporation, or health
maintenance organization, or (3) pay a rate that is less than the approved Medicaid rate set by the
LC002009 - Page 2 of 4

executive office of health and human services. For any rate that is to be charged to policyholders,
regardless of whether this rate is subject to approval by a state agency under this or another chapter,
the company shall at least thirty (30) days before implementing the rate submit under oath to the
commissioner of insurance an accounting that documents the cost structure on which the rate is
based and demonstrates the company’s compliance with this section.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-27.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-27.2. Health insurance rates.
No insurance company organized as a stock or mutual corporation that merges or
consolidates with, acquires ownership or control or possession of twenty percent (20%) or greater
of the operating assets of, or acquires control of a nonprofit hospital service corporation organized
under chapter 19 of this title, a nonprofit medical service corporation organized under chapter 20
of this title, or a health maintenance organization organized under chapter 41 of this title: (1) May
file with any state agency for review or approval any proposed rate to be used by the company in
the state, or (2) May charge to any party in the state any rate or premium, that takes into account or
reflects in any manner the value of any contribution, distribution, or allocation the company
expends or incurs in establishing or funding a charitable foundation organized to maintain or
account for the assets of a nonprofit hospital service corporation, nonprofit medical service
corporation, or health maintenance organization, or (3) pay a rate that is less than the approved
Medicaid rate set by the executive office of health and human services. For any rate that is to be
charged to policyholders, regardless of whether this rate is subject to approval by a state agency
under this or another chapter, the company shall at least thirty (30) days before implementing the
rate submit under oath to the commissioner of insurance an accounting that documents the cost
structure on which the rate is based and demonstrates the company’s compliance with this section.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002009
========
LC002009 - Page 3 of 4